Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB493.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 901.1. Acute care mental health bed registry and referrals.(a) The department shall develop and administer a web-based acute care mental health bed registry to facilitate the temporary hospitalization and treatment of individuals who meet the criteria for inpatient examination and treatment under 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Article II or III of the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the "Mental Health Procedures Act."(b) The department shall make the bed registry accessible to health care professionals and their designees who are treating patients in need of mental health inpatient examination and treatment and to participating facilities.(c) The department shall design the bed registry to collect, aggregate and display the information under subsection (d).(d) The bed registry shall include all of the following information:(1) General descriptive information for each participating facility, including contact information and the type of treatment and services available at each participating facility.(2) Information on the number of acute care mental health beds available at each participating facility, which information shall be updated every eight hours.(3) For each available acute care mental health bed at a participating facility, the type of patient that may be admitted.(4) The level of security provided at each participating facility.(5) Any other information that may assist a health care professional in identifying an appropriate acute care mental health bed for an individual in need of inpatient examination and treatment.(e) The department shall design the bed registry to allow health care professionals and their designees to search the bed registry for an appropriate acute care mental health bed for an individual in need of inpatient examination or treatment.20250HB0493PN0482 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) To be eligible to access the bed registry, a facility must:(1) submit information specified under subsection (d) to the department for inclusion in the bed registry; and(2) permit the facility's contact information to be monitored and accessed at any time in accordance with the department's regulations promulgated under subsection (i).(g) The department may contract with a third party to develop and administer the bed registry.(h) The department shall make information regarding the bed registry accessible to the public but with a limited view for the purpose of protecting confidential personal or medical information. The information regarding the bed registry that is available on a publicly accessible Internet website shall include:(1) Descriptive information relating to the location and contact information for each participating facility.(2) The number of available beds and types of services available at each participating facility.(3) The number of individuals on a waiting list to receive services.(4) The estimated days until the next bed is available.(5) The time and date that the bed registry was last updated.(i) The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.(j) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acute care mental health bed." A bed located at a mental 20250HB0493PN0482 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health facility that provides acute care mental health services."Bed registry." The acute care mental health bed registry established under this section."Facility." A mental health facility."Health care professional." An individual licensed as a physician, osteopath, physician assistant or certified registered nurse practitioner."Mental health facility." A distinct part of a general hospital licensed by the department under this act or a facility that exclusively cares for the mentally ill and is licensed by the Department of Human Services under the "Mental Health Procedures Act" or Article X of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code," that provides inpatient mental health examination and treatment. The term does not include the emergency department of a general hospital."Participating facility." A facility that satisfies the conditions under subsection (f).Section 2. Within 10 days of the development of the bed registry under section 901.1 of the act, the Department of Health shall transmit notice of the development of the bed registry to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of section 901.1(h) of the act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect 60 days after the date of the publication of the notice under section 2 of this act.20250HB0493PN0482 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930